src/fst/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON ADJ_MARTO
!!  The quantitative gradation of t after r in o stems is in class
!!  `@LEXNAME@`, which corresponds to dictionary class ¹⁻J.
!!€gt-norm:  Adjective gradations 1 t~r o
!!€  marto: marto+A+Sg+Nom # ???
!!€  marrossa: marto+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  martoihin: marto+A+Pl+Ill
!!€  marroista: marto+A+Pl+Ela
!!€  marrompi: marto+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€  marroin: marto+A+Superl+Sg+Nom
0:to  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:to  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:ro  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:to  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:ro  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:to  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN  ;
0:to  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_ON  ;
0:to  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA  ;
0:to  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
0:to  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:ro  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:ro  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;


LEXICON ADJ_PURTU
!!  The quantitative gradation of t after r in u stems is in class
!!  `@LEXNAME@`, which corresponds to dictionary class ¹⁻J.
!!  The common u stem after r is in nut participle’s passive’s back form (-tu):
!!€gt-norm:  Adjective gradations 1 t~r u
!!€  purtu: purtu+A+Sg+Nom # bitten
!!€  purrussa: purtu+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  purtuihin: purtu+A+Pl+Ill
!!€  purruista: purtu+A+Pl+Ela
!!€  purrumpi: purtu+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€  purruin: purtu+A+Superl+Sg+Nom
0:tu  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:tu  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:ru  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:tu  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:ru  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:tu  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN  ;
0:tu  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_UN  ;
0:tu  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA  ;
0:tu  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
0:tu  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:ru  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:ru  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;

LEXICON ADJ_PIERTY
!!  The quantitative gradation of t after r in y stems is in class
!!  `@LEXNAME@`, which corresponds to dictionary class ¹⁻J.
!!  The common u stem after r is in nut participle’s passive’s front fomr
!!  (-ty):
!!€gt-norm:  Adjective gradations 1 t~r y
!!€  pierty: pierty+A+Sg+Nom # befarted
!!€  pierryssä: pierty+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  piertyihin: pierty+A+Pl+Ill
!!€  pierryistä: pierty+A+Pl+Ela
!!€  pierrympi: pierty+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€  pierryin: pierty+A+Superl+Sg+Nom
0:ty  ADJ_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:ty  ADJ_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:ry  ADJ_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:ty  ADJ_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:ry  ADJ_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:ty  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN  ;
0:ty  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_YN  ;
0:ty  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ  ;
0:ty  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
0:ty  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:ry  ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:ry  ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE  ;

!!  There are no adjectives ending in -rtö. Just as well, the
!!  class for UkU : UvU- is limited to few nouns we know.

!! ### The special illative alternation with k gradation, unaltering stems
!!  The trisyllabic words ending with gradating long k have plural illative
!!  in both strong and weak forms. 


LEXICON ADJ_HUPAKKO
!!  The class for trisyllabic -kko stems is `@LEXNAME@`, the corresponding
!!  dictionary class is ⁴⁻D. 
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 4 o
!!€  hupakko: hupakko+A+Sg+Nom # silly girl
!!€  hupakoihin: hupakko+A+Pl+Ill
!!€  hupakkoihin: hupakko+A+Pl+Ill
!!€  hupakompi: hupakko+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€  hupakoin: hupakko+A+Superl+Sg+Nom
0:ko  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:ko  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:o  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:ko  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:o  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:ko  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN  ;
0:ko  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_ON  ;
0:ko  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA  ;
0:o  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA  ;
0:ko  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
0:o  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:o  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:ko  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:o  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:o  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:o  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;

!! ### Adjective stems with i:e variations
!!  The i stems of new i final words have i : e : 0 variation. These classes
!!  include new loans ending in consonant, which use -i to form inflectional
!!  stems.
!!  The i stems combined with gradation of will form five separate stem
!!  variants:

LEXICON ADJ_ABNORMI
!!  The i finals with back vowel harmony go to class `@LEXNAME@`, where
!!  old dictionary classification was ⁵.
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 5 back
!!€  abnormi: abnormi+A+Sg+Nom # abnorm
!!€  abnormeina: abnormi+A+Pl+Ess
!!€  abnormien: abnormi+A+Pl+Gen
!!€  abnormimpi: abnormi+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€  abnormein: abnormi+A+Superl+Sg+Nom
0:i  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:i  ADJ_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0:e  ADJ_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:i  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN  ;
0:i  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IN  ;
0:e  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
0:e  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:i  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:e  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;

LEXICON ADJ_STYDI
!!  The i finals with front vowel harmony go to class `@LEXNAME@`, where
!!  old dictionary classification was ⁵.
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 5 front
!!€  stydi: stydi+A+Sg+Nom # stiff
!!€  stydeinä: stydi+A+Pl+Ess
!!€  stydien: stydi+A+Pl+Gen
!!€  stydimpi: stydi+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€  stydein: stydi+A+Superl+Sg+Nom
0:i  ADJ_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:i  ADJ_FRONT_SINGULARS  ;
0:e  ADJ_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
0:i  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN  ;
0:i  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IN  ;
0:e  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
0:e  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:i  ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:e  ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE  ;

LEXICON ADJ_OPAAKKI
!!  Stems with quantitative k gradation, i final and back harmony are in class 
!!  `@LEXNAME@` and dictionary class ⁵⁻A or ⁵⁻D.
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 5 k~0 back
!!€  opaakki: opaakki+A+Sg+Nom # opaque
!!€  opaakissa: opaakki+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  opaakkeina: opaakki+A+Pl+Ess
!!€  opaakeista: opaakki+A+Pl+Ela
!!€  opaakkien: opaakki+A+Pl+Gen
!!€  opaakimpi: opaakki+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€  opaakein: opaakki+A+Superl+Sg+Nom
0:ki  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:ki  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:i  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:ke  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:e  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:ki  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN  ;
0:ki  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IN  ;
0:ke  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA  ;
0:k  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
0:ke  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:i  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:ke  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;

LEXICON ADJ_PINKKI
!!  Stems with quantitative k gradation, i final and front harmony are in class
!!  `@LEXNAME@` and dictionary class ⁵⁻A or ⁵⁻D.
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 5 k~0 front
!!€  pinkki: pinkki+A+Sg+Nom # pink
!!€  pinkissä: pinkki+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  pinkkeinä: pinkki+A+Pl+Ess
!!€  pinkeistä: pinkki+A+Pl+Ela
!!€  pinkkien: pinkki+A+Pl+Gen
!!€  pinkimpi: pinkki+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€  pinkein: pinkki+A+Superl+Sg+Nom
0:ki  ADJ_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:ki  ADJ_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:i  ADJ_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:ke  ADJ_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:e  ADJ_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:ki  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN  ;
0:ki  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IN  ;
0:ke  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ  ;
0:k  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
0:ke  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:i  ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:ke  ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE  ;

!!  There's no back vowel version of the bisyllabic gradating -ppi form.

LEXICON ADJ_SIPPI
!!  Stems with quantitative p gradation, i final and front harmony are in class
!!  `@LEXNAME@` and dictionary class ⁵⁻B.
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 5 p~0 front
!!€  sippi: sippi+A+Sg+Nom # bust
!!€  sipissä: sippi+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  sippeinä: sippi+A+Pl+Ess
!!€  sipeistä: sippi+A+Pl+Ela
!!€  sippien: sippi+A+Pl+Gen
!!€  sipimpi: sippi+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€  sipein: sippi+A+Superl+Sg+Nom
0:pi  ADJ_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:pi  ADJ_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:i  ADJ_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:pe  ADJ_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:e  ADJ_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:pi  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN  ;
0:pi  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IN  ;
0:pe  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ  ;
0:p  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
0:pe  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:i  ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:pe  ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE  ;
